Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 32.
Milk Commission.

Sec.

3.2-3204. General powers of the Milk Commission.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 1A M.J. Administrative Law,

§

3; 8B M.J. Food,

§

3; 13A M.J. Monopolies and Restraints of Trade,

§

1.

§ 3.2-3204. General powers of the Milk Commission.

The Commission shall be vested with the following powers:

To confer and cooperate with the legally constituted authorities of other states and of the United States, with a view of securing a uniformity of milk control, with respect to milk coming into the Commonwealth and going out of the Commonwealth in interstate commerce, with a view of accomplishing the purposes of this chapter and to enter into a compact or compacts for such uniform system of milk control;

To investigate all matters pertaining to the production, processing, storage, transportation, distribution, and sale of milk in the Commonwealth;

To supervise, regulate, and control the production, transportation, processing, storage, distribution, delivery, and sale of milk for consumption within the Commonwealth;

To act as mediator or arbiter in any controversial issue that may arise among or between milk producers and distributors, as between themselves, or that may arise between them as groups;

To examine into the business, books, and accounts of any milk producer, association of producers, or milk distributors, their affiliates or subsidiaries; to issue subpoenas to milk producers, associations of producers, and milk distributors, and to require them to produce their records, books, and accounts; to subpoena any other person from whom information is desired;

To take depositions of witnesses within, or without, the Commonwealth. Any member of the Commission, or any employee designated by the Commission, may administer oaths to witnesses and sign and issue subpoenas; and

To make, adopt, and enforce all regulations or orders necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Every order of the Commission shall be posted for inspection in the main office of the Commission, and a certified copy filed in the office of the Commissioner. An order, applying only to a person named therein, shall be served on the person affected. An order, that is required to be served, shall be served by personal delivery of a certified copy, or by mailing a certified copy in a sealed envelope, with postage prepaid, to each person affected; or, in the case of a corporation, to any officer or agent of the corporation upon whom legal process may be served. If an order is not required to be served, then it shall be posted in the main office of the Commission and filed in the office of the Commissioner, which shall constitute due and sufficient notice to any person affected by the order.

(Code 1950, § 3-352; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-430; 2008, c. 860.)

Editor's note.

- The cases annotated below were decided under prior law.